Massachusetts, session 194th, H736.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8A of chapter 90, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition of the
General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following
paragraph:- There shall be training relative to de-escalation tactics and techniques approved by
the commissioner of education required for all school bus operators. If employed, the operator’s
employer shall pay for the cost of the de-escalation training.
of 1